Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 20m of Title 74, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Office of the Attorney General to be designated the "Public
Safety Technology Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of
all monies received by the Office of the Attorney General as
designated by law. All monies accruing to the credit of said fund
are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the
Office for the purpose of funding grants to local law enforcement
divisions to cover some of the costs associated with using
technology to better interface with the public. Expenditures from
said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 27th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1250 Page 2